Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1011.
do enact as follows:SB1011,11Section 1. 20.437 (2) (ct) of the statutes is created to read:SB1011,2,6220.437 (2) (ct) Wisconsin Works child care eligibility expansion. A sum 3sufficient for paying child care subsidies under s. 49.155 to individuals who are 4eligible for those subsidies under s. 49.155 (1m) (c) 1d. but not under s. 49.155 (1m) 5(c) 1. and, if no other funding for this purpose is available, to individuals who are 6eligible for those subsidies under s. 49.155 (1m) (c) 1.SB1011,27Section 2. 49.155 (1m) (c) 1. (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1011,3,4849.155 (1m) (c) 1. (intro.) Except as provided in subds. 1d., 1g., 1h., 1m., 2., 9and 3., the gross income of the individual’s family is at or below 200 85 percent of 10the poverty line state median income for a family the size of the individual’s family. 11In calculating the gross income of the family, the department or county department 12or agency determining eligibility shall include court-ordered child or family support 1payments received by the individual, if those support payments exceed $1,250 per 2month, and income described under s. 49.145 (3) (b) 1. and 3., except that, in 3calculating farm and self-employment income, the department or county 4department or agency determining eligibility shall include the sum of the following:SB1011,35Section 3. 49.155 (1m) (c) 1d. a. of the statutes is renumbered 49.155 (1m) (c) 61d. and amended to read:SB1011,3,19749.155 (1m) (c) 1d. Notwithstanding sub. (5) (b), if the individual is already 8receiving a child care subsidy under this section and the gross income of the 9individual’s family exceeds 200 85 percent of the poverty line state median income 10for a family the size of the individual’s family, the individual’s copayment amount 11under sub. (5) increases by $1 for every $3 by which the individual’s family’s gross 12income exceeds 200 percent of the poverty line for a family the size of the 13individual’s family. Beginning in fiscal year 2024-25, to the extent that the 14individual’s family’s gross income exceeds 200 percent of the poverty line for a 15family the size of the individual’s family, the individual’s copayment amount under 16sub. (5) increases by $1 for every $5 individual shall continue to be eligible for the 17child care subsidy under this section until the gross income of the individual’s 18family exceeds 100 percent of the state median income for a family the size of the 19individual’s family.SB1011,420Section 4. 49.155 (1m) (c) 1d. b. of the statutes is repealed.SB1011,521Section 5. 49.155 (1m) (c) 1h. of the statutes is amended to read:SB1011,4,62249.155 (1m) (c) 1h. If the individual is a relative of the child, is providing care 23for the child under a court order, and is receiving payments under s. 48.57 (3m) or 24(3n) on behalf of the child, the child’s biological or adoptive family has a gross 1income that is at or below 200 85 percent of the poverty line state median income. 2In calculating the gross income of the child’s biological or adoptive family, the 3department or county department or agency determining eligibility shall include 4court-ordered child or family support payments received by the individual, if those 5support payments exceed $1,250 per month, and income described under s. 49.145 6(3) (b) 1. and 3.SB1011,67Section 6. 49.155 (1m) (c) 1m. of the statutes is amended to read:SB1011,4,16849.155 (1m) (c) 1m. If the individual was eligible under s. 49.132 (4) (a), 1995 9stats., for aid under s. 49.132, 1995 stats., and received aid under s. 49.132, 1995 10stats., on September 30, 1997, but lost aid solely because of the application of s. 1149.132 (6), 1995 stats., the gross income of the individual’s family is at or below 200 1285 percent of the poverty line state median income for a family the size of the 13individual’s family. This subdivision does not apply to an individual whose family’s 14gross income at any time on or after September 30, 1997, is more than 200 85 15percent of the poverty line state median income for a family the size of the 16individual’s family.SB1011,717Section 7. 49.155 (1m) (c) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:SB1011,5,21849.155 (1m) (c) 2. If the individual was eligible under s. 49.132 (4) (am), 1995 19stats., for aid under s. 49.132, 1995 stats., and received aid under s. 49.132, 1995 20stats., on or after May 10, 1996, but lost eligibility solely because of increased 21income, the gross income of the individual’s family is at or below 200 85 percent of 22the poverty line state median income for a family the size of the individual’s family. 23This subdivision does not apply to an individual whose family’s gross income 1increased to more than 200 85 percent of the poverty line state median income for a 2family the size of the individual’s family.SB1011,83Section 8. 49.155 (1m) (c) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:SB1011,5,11449.155 (1m) (c) 3. If the individual was eligible for a child care subsidy under 5s. 49.191 (2), 1997 stats., on or after May 10, 1996, and received a child care subsidy 6on or after May 10, 1996, but lost the subsidy solely because of increased income, 7the gross income of the individual’s family is at or below 200 85 percent of the 8poverty line state median income for a family the size of the individual’s family. 9This subdivision does not apply to an individual whose family’s gross income 10increased to more than 200 85 percent of the poverty line state median income for a 11family the size of the individual’s family.SB1011,912Section 9. Fiscal changes.SB1011,5,1613(1) In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department 14of children and families under s. 20.437 (1) (a), the dollar amount for fiscal year 152026-27 is increased by $1,250,000 to implement the changes to eligibility for the 16child care subsidies under s. 49.155 made in this act.SB1011,5,1717